Washington statutes.
RCW 26.28.020

Married persons—When deemed of full age.

All minor persons married to a person of full age shall be deemed and taken to be of full age.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 38; Code 1881 s 2364; 1863 p 434 s 2; 1854 p 407 s 2; RRS s 10549.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.